California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) “Water treatment device” means any product that (1) is designed to alter the chemical or physical properties or characteristics of water or plumbing or the seller, lessor, or renter claims can alter the chemical or physical properties or characteristics of water or plumbing and (2) is used or sold,
 leased, or rented for use on residential real property primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. “Water treatment device” does not include any device that is regulated pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 4040) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, corporation, or association, or any employee or agent thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

17577.2.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following in connection with the sale, lease, rental, offer to sell, lease, rent, or other disposition of water treatment devices:

(a) Make any untrue or misleading oral or written statements regarding the presence of one or more contaminants in water, or the performance of water treatment devices, including, but not limited to, the following oral or written statements:

(1) (A) Any contaminant exists in the water of any person to whom the statement is directed unless the statement is true, is reasonably based on factual data, and at least a written
 summary of the factual data, that has been prepared or approved by the source of the factual data, is disclosed to the person to whom the statement is directed before that person executes any contract for the purchase, lease, or rental of a water treatment device.

(B) Any contaminant may exist in the water of any person to whom the statement is directed unless the statement is true and is reasonably based on factual data.

(2) A relationship between water quality and acute or chronic illness exists as a scientific certainty unless that statement is true.

(3) The public water system, utility, or treatment plant that supplies water to the person to whom the statement is directed does not test, treat, or remove particular
 substances from water treated by it unless the statement is true.

(4) A water treatment device removes particular contaminants or other substances from water unless the statement is true, is reasonably based on factual data in existence at the time the statement is made, and the requirements of subparagraphs (A) through (C) are satisfied.

(A) If the particular contaminants or other substances mentioned in the statement described in paragraph (4) are not necessarily in the water of the person to whom the statement is made, the following disclosure or its equivalent must be clearly and conspicuously made: “The contaminants or other substances removed or reduced by this water treatment device are not necessarily in your water.”

(B) If the statement described in paragraph (4) is oral, the disclosure described in subparagraph (A) shall be made orally and shall immediately follow the statement. If the statement is in writing, the disclosure shall be in writing and shall be placed
 immediately next to the written statement.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), no statement about the ability of a water treatment device to remove particular contaminants or other substances shall be used to imply falsely that any of those contaminants or other substances are present in the water of the person to whom the statement is made.

(5) Use news events, reports, or descriptions of water quality problems or health hazards associated with water systems or suppliers different from the systems or suppliers of the intended consumer unless, at the same time, the seller sets forth conspicuously and prominently a statement, if true, that the seller has no information that the intended consumer’s water supply has the water quality problems or health hazards referred
 to in the news events, reports, or descriptions.

(6) A water treatment device would provide a health benefit or diminish a health risk unless it would do so.

(7) A water treatment device will solve or contribute to the solution of any problem unless the statement is true.

(b) Perform precipitation tests of the individual consumer’s drinking water without also clearly informing the consumer of the results, scope, and limits of the test. Precipitation tests may only be used to demonstrate the hardness or other nonhealth-related characteristics of the water being tested.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), make product performance claims or product benefit claims
 that the device affects the health or the safety of drinking water, unless the device complies with Article 3 (commencing with Section 116825) of Chapter 5 of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. This subdivision does not apply to the making of truthful and nonmisleading claims regarding the removal or reduction of contaminants not associated with a health or safety claim pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 116825) of Chapter 5 of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Use pictures, exhibits, graphs, charts, other graphic portrayals, endorsements, or testimonials in any untrue or misleading manner.

(e) Fail to disclose clearly and conspicuously, in writing, to the purchaser, lessee, or renter, prior to the time of purchase, lease,
 or rent, the importance of maintaining the water treatment device according to the manufacturer’s instructions, including, if applicable, replacement of screens and filters. In addition, a separate printed gummed label, tag, or other convenient form of reminder of the importance of proper maintenance shall be provided to the purchaser, lessee, or renter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 403, Sec. 1.   (AB 119)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17577.3.

(a) A contract or offer which is subject to approval, for the sale, lease, or rental of a water treatment device shall be deemed a home solicitation contract or offer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1689.5 of the Civil Code regardless of where the contract or offer was made, and shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 1689.5 to 1689.13, inclusive, of the Civil Code if the contract or offer arises out of a scheduled presentation to promote the sale, lease, or rental of a water treatment device to a person invited to attend the presentation at a location other than a private residence.

(b) A water treatment device or any other materials that are the subject of a contract offer described in subdivision (a) may
 be delivered and installed during the rescission period provided in Sections 1689.5 to 1689.13, inclusive, of the Civil Code. Notwithstanding any other law, if a buyer exercises his or her right to rescind the contract in accordance with those rescission provisions, the seller shall be responsible for all costs in removing the installed water treatment device or any other materials and shall remove that device or any other materials within 20 days of the rescission. If the seller’s services result in the alteration of property of the buyer, the seller shall restore the property to substantially as good condition as it was at the time the services were rendered.

(c) A water treatment device or any other materials that are the subject of a contract offer described in subdivision (a) shall be delivered and installed in accordance with Section 7163 and the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.), as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 932, Sec. 1.   (SB 981)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17577.4.

Any violation of this article is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1278, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17577.5.

(a) No contract or offer for the sale, lease, or rental of a home water treatment device and no purchase money loan, as defined in subdivision (b), shall provide for a lien on real property. Any lien taken in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.

(b) For the purpose of this section, “purchase money loan” means a loan or an advance under an open-end credit account if both of the following occur:

(1) The primary purpose of the loan or the primary purpose of establishing the open-end credit account is to finance all or a portion of the purchase price or any of the lease or rental payments for a water
 treatment device.

(2) The creditor knows the primary purpose of the loan or the primary purpose of establishing the open-end credit account when the loan is initially made or the open-end credit account is established.

(c) The creditor shall be deemed to know that the primary purpose of the loan or the primary purpose of establishing the open-end credit account is the primary purpose described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) if any of the following occur:

(1) The consumer’s application for credit or any other document in the creditor’s possession before the loan is made or the open-end account is established indicates the primary purpose of the loan or the open-end credit account.

(2) The seller, lessor, or renter arranges or guarantees the loan or
 open-end account, or participates in the preparation of the consumer’s application for credit or other loan documents, or receives from the creditor a loan commission, brokerage, or referral fee.

(d) For the purpose of this section, “open-end credit” has the same meaning as used in Section 226.2 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) This section does not apply to mechanics liens established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8400) of Title 2 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 10.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

17577.6.

(a) A buyer, lessee, or renter of a water treatment device may bring an action against any person who violates this article for the recovery of actual damages, exemplary damages, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, and appropriate equitable relief.

(b) The rights and remedies provided in this article are in addition to, and not a limitation of, any other rights and remedies provided by law.

(c) Any action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within three years of the discovery by the
 party of the alleged violation.

(d) Any waiver of this article shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Environmental Representations [17580. - 17581.]

17580.

(a) A person who represents in advertising or on the label or container of a consumer good that the consumer good that it manufactures or distributes is not harmful to, or is beneficial to, the natural environment, through the use of such terms as “environmental choice,” “ecologically friendly,” “earth friendly,” “environmentally friendly,” “ecologically sound,” “environmentally sound,” “environmentally safe,” “ecologically safe,” “environmentally lite,” “green product,” or any other like term, or through the use of a chasing arrows symbol or by otherwise directing a consumer to recycle the consumer good, shall maintain in written form in its records all of the following information and documentation supporting the validity of the representation:

(1) The reasons the
 person believes the representation to be true.

(2) Any significant adverse environmental impacts directly associated with the production, distribution, use, and disposal of the consumer good.

(3) Any measures that are taken by the person to reduce the environmental impacts directly associated with the production, distribution, and disposal of the consumer good.

(4) Violations of any federal, state, or local permits directly associated with the production or distribution of the consumer good.

(5) Whether, if applicable, the consumer good conforms with the uniform standards contained in the Federal Trade Commission Guidelines for Environmental Marketing Claims for the use of the terms “recycled,” “recyclable,” “biodegradable,” “photodegradable,” or “ozone
 friendly.”

(6) If the person uses the term “recyclable,” uses a chasing arrows symbol, or otherwise directs a consumer to recycle the consumer good, whether the consumer good meets all of the criteria for statewide recyclability pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42355.51 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) Information and documentation maintained pursuant to this section shall be furnished to any member of the public upon request.

(c) For purposes of this section, a wholesaler or retailer who does not initiate a representation by advertising or by placing the representation on a package shall not be deemed to have made the representation.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the information and documentation supporting the validity of the
 representation maintained under this section shall be fully disclosed to the public, within the limits of all applicable laws.

(e) For purposes of this section, displaying a chasing arrows symbol or otherwise directing a consumer to recycle a consumer good shall not be considered misleading pursuant to Section 17580.5 or Section 42355.51 of the Public Resources Code if either of the following applies:

(1) The consumer good is required by any federal or California law or regulation to display a chasing arrows symbol, including, but not limited to, Section 103(b)(1) of the federal Mercury-Containing and Rechargeable Battery Management Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 14322(b)(1)) and Section 25215.65 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The consumer good is a beverage container subject to the California Beverage Container Recycling
 and Litter Reduction Act (Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code).

(f) For purposes of this section, “chasing arrows symbol” means an equilateral triangle, formed by three arrows curved at their midpoints, depicting a clockwise path, with a short gap separating the apex of each arrow from the base of the adjacent arrow. “Chasing arrows symbol” also includes variants of that symbol that are likely to be interpreted by a consumer as an implication of recyclability, including, but not limited to, one or more arrows arranged in a circular pattern or around a globe.

(g) For purposes of this section, a direction to a consumer to properly dispose of or otherwise properly handle a consumer good at the end of its useful life shall not be considered “otherwise directing a consumer to recycle a consumer good” pursuant to subdivision (a) if both of the
 following requirements are met:

(1) The consumer good is subject to any of the following programs:

(A) Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 42970) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code relating to product stewardship for carpets.

(B) The Used Mattress Recovery and Recycling Act (Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 42985) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code).

(C) The California Tire Recycling Act (Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 42860) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code).

(D) The Electronic Waste Recycling Act of 2003 (Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 42460) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code).

(E) Article 10.3 (commencing with Section 25214.9) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code relating to electronic waste.

(F) The Rechargeable Battery Recycling Act of 2006 (Chapter 8.4 (commencing with Section 42451) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code).

(G) The Cell Phone Recycling Act of 2004 (Chapter 8.7 (commencing with Section 42490) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code).

(H) The paint product recovery program established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 48700) of Part 7 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code.

(I) The Mercury Thermostat Collection Act of 2001 (Article 10.2.2 (commencing with Section 25214.8.10) of
 Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code).

(J) The Lead-Acid Battery Recycling Act of 2016 (Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 25215) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) The direction to the consumer accurately instructs the consumer to dispose of the consumer good through participation in, and consistent with, one of the programs identified in paragraph (1) as that program applies to the consumer good.

(h) For purposes of this section, directing a consumer to compost or properly dispose of a consumer good through an organics recycling program shall not be considered “otherwise directing a consumer to recycle a consumer good” pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 15.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17580.5.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to make an untruthful, deceptive, or misleading environmental marketing claim, whether explicit or implied. For the purpose of this section, “environmental marketing claim” shall include any claim contained in the “Guides for the Use of Environmental Marketing Claims” published by the Federal Trade Commission.

(b) (1) It shall be a defense to any suit or complaint brought under this section that the person’s environmental marketing claims conform to the standards or are consistent with the examples contained in the “Guides for the Use of Environmental Marketing Claims” published by the Federal Trade Commission.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to either of the following:

 (A) Claims for violations of subdivision (d) of Section 18015 of the Public Resources Code.

 (B) Claims for violations of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42355.51 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 507, Sec. 2.   (SB 343)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17581.

Any violation of this article is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1413, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Automotive Products [17582. - 17582.]

17582.

(a) Any engine coolant or antifreeze sold in this state after January 1, 2004, that is manufactured after July 1, 2003, and that contains more than 10 percent ethylene glycol, shall include denatonium benzoate at a minimum of 30 parts per million as a bittering agent within the product so as to render it unpalatable. Another aversive agent may be used if it meets or exceeds the degree of aversion in test subjects obtained by utilizing the formulation of 30 parts per million of denatonium benzoate in antifreeze. Any manufacturer
 or packager of a product subject to this section shall maintain a record of the trade name, scientific name, and active ingredients of any bittering agent used pursuant to this chapter. Information and documentation maintained pursuant to this section shall be furnished to any member of the public upon request.

(b) (1) A manufacturer, distributor, recycler, or seller of an automotive product that is required to contain an aversive agent under this section is not liable to any person for any personal injury, death, or property damage that results from the inclusion of denatonium benzoate in ethylene glycol antifreeze.

(2) The limitation on liability provided by this subdivision is only applicable if denatonium benzoate is included in ethylene glycol antifreeze in concentrations mandated by this section.

(3) The limitation on liability provided by this subdivision does not apply if the personal injury, death, or property damage results from willful or wanton misconduct by the manufacturer, distributor, recycler, or seller of the ethylene glycol antifreeze.

(c) This section shall not be construed to apply to any of the following:

(1) The sale of a motor vehicle that contains engine coolant or antifreeze.

(2) Wholesale containers of antifreeze containing 55 gallons or more of the antifreeze.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Unsolicited and Unwanted Telephone Solicitations [17590. - 17594.]

17590.

(a) There is a compelling state interest to protect the privacy of residential or wireless telephone subscribers who wish to avoid unsolicited and unwanted telephone solicitations. For the purposes of this article, a residential or wireless telephone subscriber shall be referred to as a subscriber.

(b) The act of becoming a subscriber should not undermine or lessen a person’s right of privacy as guaranteed under Section 1 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(c) Congress has passed and the President has signed the “Do-Not-Call Implementation Act” (H.R. 395) which authorizes the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) to implement and enforce a national “do not call” registry. The FTC has decided to create as part of the federal Telemarketing Sales Rule (16 C.F.R. 310) a single nationwide Do Not Call Registry (16 C.F.R. 310.4 (b)(1)(iii)(B)), which is anticipated to be fully implemented by the late fall of 2003. Thus, it is the intent of the Legislature to adopt the California telephone numbers on the national “do not call” registry as the California “do not call” registry. Doing so will have many benefits for California residents and businesses. For instance, it is free for consumers to register on the national registry; California residents will only have to register on one registry, instead of two; registration on the national registry is only required once every five years; and businesses affected by the
 law will only be required to purchase one registry, instead of two. Additionally, adopting the California telephone numbers on the national “do not call” registry as the California “do not call” registry will mean that California does not have to set up its own administrative system to develop and maintain a California only “do not call” registry, thus saving California tax payers millions of dollars.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 779, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17591.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following: using the “do not call” list for any purpose other than to comply with this article or applicable federal laws; denying or interfering in any way, directly or indirectly, with a subscriber’s right to place a California telephone number on the “do not call” list; causing a subscriber to participate in and be included on the “do not call” list without the subscriber’s knowledge or consent; selling or leasing the “do not call” list to a person other than a telephone solicitor; selling or leasing by a
 telephone solicitor of the “do not call” list; charging a fee to place a California telephone number on the “do not call” list; and a telephone solicitor, either directly or indirectly, persuading a subscriber with whom it has an established business relationship to place his or her telephone number on the “do not call” list, if the solicitation has the effect of preventing competitors from contacting that solicitor’s customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 779, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17592.

(a) For purposes of this article:

(1) A “telephone solicitor” means any person or entity who, on his or her own behalf or through salespersons or agents, announcing devices, or otherwise, makes or causes a telephone call to be made to a California telephone number that does any of the following:

(A) Seeks to offer a prize or to rent, sell, exchange, promote, gift, or lease goods or services or documents that can
 be used to obtain goods or services.

(B) Offers or solicits or seeks to offer or solicit any extension of credit for personal, family, or household purposes.

(C) Seeks marketing information that will or may be used for the direct solicitation of a sale of goods or services to the subscriber.

(D) Seeks to sell or promote any investment, insurance, or financial services.

(E) Seeks to make any telephone solicitation or attempted telephone solicitation as described in Section 17511.1.

(2) “Do not call” list means the California telephone numbers on the national “do not call” registry established and maintained by the Federal Trade Commission, as described in Section 310.4(b)(1)(iii)(B) of
 Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A “do not call” list is current if it was obtained from the Federal Trade Commission no more than three months prior to the date a call is made.

(b) A person or entity does not necessarily qualify as a telephone solicitor if the products or services of the person or entity are sold or marketed by an independent contractor whose business practices are not controlled by the person or entity.

(c) Except for telephone calls described in subdivision (e), beginning on the 31st day after the Federal Trade Commission makes its first “do not call” list available to telephone solicitors, no telephone solicitor shall call any telephone number on the then current “do not call” list and do any of the following:

(1) Seek to offer a prize or to rent, sell, exchange, promote, gift, or
 lease goods or services or documents that can be used to obtain goods or services.

(2) Offer or solicit or seek to offer or solicit any extension of credit for personal, family, or household purposes.

(3) Seek marketing information that will or may be used for the direct solicitation of a sale of goods or services to the subscriber.

(4) Seek to sell or promote any investment, insurance, or financial services.

(5) Seek to make any telephone solicitation or attempted telephone solicitation as described in Section 17511.1.

(d) No person or entity that sells, leases, exchanges, or rents telephone solicitation lists shall include in those lists those telephone numbers that appear on the current
 “do not call” list, except that this subdivision does not apply to lists used for directory assistance and numbers published in telephone directories that list substantially all publicly available telephone numbers in a specific geographic area.

(e) Subdivision (c) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Telephone calls made pursuant to the express agreement, in writing, of the subscriber to place calls to that California telephone number. This written agreement shall clearly evidence the person’s authorization that calls made by or on behalf of a specific party may be placed to that California telephone number, and shall include the signature of that person. In any dispute regarding whether a subscriber has provided this express written permission, the telephone solicitor has the burden of proving that the subscriber has provided this permission by producing the original or
 a facsimile document, signed by the subscriber, evidencing that permission; or an advertisement by the subscriber. “Express agreement” does not include any consent or permission included in any contract of adhesion.

(2) Telephone calls made pursuant to the express request of the subscriber. “Express request” may include a telephone call from a person or entity who has been provided the subscriber’s telephone number and name as a referral from a solicitor with which the subscriber has an established business relationship, if that solicitor has obtained the subscriber’s express request for the referral. “Express request” does not include any consent or permission included in any contract of adhesion. A telephone call is presumed not to be made at the express request of a subscriber if one of the following occurs, as applicable:

(A) The call is made 30 business days after the last
 date on which the subscriber contacted a business with the purpose of inquiring about the potential purchase of goods or services.

(B) The call is made 30 business days after the last date on which the subscriber consented to be contacted.

(C) The call is made after the subscriber has requested that no further telephone calls be made to him or her.

(D) The call is made 30 business days after a product or service becomes available where the subscriber has made a request to the business for that product or service that is not then available, and requests a call when the product or service becomes available.

(3) Telephone calls made in connection with the collection of a debt or the offer by a creditor to the subscriber of an extension of credit to pay a
 delinquent obligation owed by the subscriber to that creditor.

(4) Telephone calls made to a subscriber if the telephone solicitor has an established business relationship with the subscriber. As used in this article, “established business relationship” means a relationship between a seller and a subscriber based on the subscriber’s purchase, rental, or lease of the seller’s goods or services or a financial transaction between the consumer and seller, within the 18 months immediately preceding the date of a telemarketing call. If a subscriber purchases or obtains a product or service through a licensed agent or broker, for purposes of this article an established business relationship is created with the licensed agent or broker individually, apart from and in addition to, any established business relationship that may have been created by a licensed agent or broker acting on behalf of another, and the licensed agent or broker is a telephone
 solicitor, as defined in subdivision (a). Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph, an established business relationship does not exist between the subscriber and any separate legal entity associated with the telephone solicitor not acting as an agent or vendor on behalf of the telephone solicitor, as defined in subdivision (a), unless the separate legal entity shares the brand name of a business with which the subscriber has an otherwise established business relationship. If the subscriber instructs the telephone solicitor to place the subscriber on the telephone solicitor’s list pursuant to Section 64.1200 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 310.4(b)(1)(iii)(A) of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that instruction shall be binding on the entity with which the subscriber has the established business relationship, with any entity that has the shared brand name, and all other entities that share that brand name, none of whom may initiate further telephone solicitation
 calls to that subscriber. Separate legal entities include, but are not limited to, any parent company or entity, any subsidiary company or entity, any partnership or copartner, any joint venture or venturer, association member, or comember, or any affiliated company or entity.

(5) Telephone calls made by an individual businessperson or a small business if the individual businessperson or small business employs no more than five full- or part-time employees or independent contractors, the individual businessperson or a principal of the small business makes the telephone calls himself or herself for the sale of goods or services offered by that individual businessperson or small business, and the telephone calls are made to subscribers within a 50-mile radius of the location of the individual businessperson or small business. For purposes of this section, the services offered by the individual businessperson or small business cannot be
 telemarketing services. For purposes of this section, those independent contractors and employees with whom an individual businessperson or a small business is required to have a written independent contractor or employment agreement pursuant to a regulatory scheme to ensure regulatory accountability of those independent contractors or employees, are not counted against the total referenced above.

(6) A telephone call made solely to verify that a subscriber, and not an unauthorized third party, has terminated an established business relationship.

(7) Telephone calls made by a tax-exempt charitable organization.

(8) A telephone call made for the purpose of soliciting a donation without the purchase of goods or services.

(f) (1) Nothing in this section prohibits a telephone solicitor from contacting by mail a subscriber whose telephone number appears on the “do not call” list to obtain the subscriber’s express written permission allowing the telephone solicitor to make the calls described in subdivision (c).

(2) An express written permission described in paragraph (1) shall include a clear and conspicuous disclosure of all of the following, except as provided in paragraph (3):

(A) Identification of the name of the sender of the mailing and of the entity that is requesting permission to call.

(B) The subscriber’s telephone number to which the calls may be placed.

(C) The signature of the subscriber authorizing the call.

(D) Notice that the subscriber may be contacted by a telephone solicitor or someone calling on behalf of the specific party identified in the request for permission, even if the subscriber’s telephone number is listed on the federal “do not call” registry.

(3) Where there is an established business relationship, as defined under state or federal law, between a subscriber and a telephone solicitor, express written permission described in paragraph (1)is not required.

(4) In any dispute regarding whether a subscriber has provided this express written permission, the telephone solicitor has the burden of proving that the subscriber has provided this permission by producing the original or a facsimile document, signed by the subscriber, evidencing that permission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17593.

(a) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction against a telephone solicitor to enforce the article and to obtain any one or more of the following remedies:

(1) An order to enjoin the violation.

(2) A civil penalty of up to the penalty amount that the Federal Trade Commission may seek pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1)
 of subsection (m) of Section 45 of Title 15 of the United States Code as specified in Section 1.98 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(b) Any person who has received a telephone solicitation that is prohibited by Section 17592, or whose telephone number was used in violation of Section 17591, may bring a civil action in small claims court for an injunction or order to prevent further violations. If a person obtains an injunction or order under this subdivision and service of the injunction or order is properly effected, a person who thereafter receives further solicitations in violation of the injunction or order within 30 days after service of the initial injunction or order, may file a subsequent action in small claims court seeking enforcement of the injunction or order and a civil penalty to be awarded to the
 person in an amount up to one thousand dollars ($1,000). For purposes of this subdivision, a person’s claims may not be aggregated to establish jurisdiction in a court other than small claims court. For purposes of this subdivision, a defendant is not required to personally appear, but may appear by affidavit or by written instrument.

(c) The rights, remedies, and penalties established by this article are in addition to the rights, remedies, or penalties established under other laws.

(d) It shall be an affirmative defense to any action brought under this article that the violation was accidental and in violation of the telephone solicitor’s policies and procedures and telemarketer instruction and training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17594.

Any information regarding any California telephone number that appears on the “do not call” list in the possession of the Attorney General, whether obtained from the Federal Trade Commission or submitted to the Attorney General by a subscriber for inclusion in the “do not call” list, shall not be disclosed pursuant to a request made under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code and shall also be privileged under Section 1040 of the Evidence Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this section prevents the Attorney General from providing a certificate stating whether a specific telephone number was on the “do not call” list that was effective on the specified date or range
 of dates in response to:

(a) An inquiry from any law enforcement agency that is investigating, prosecuting, or responding to an allegation of a violation of this article.

(b) An inquiry from an individual who is investigating or litigating an alleged violation of this article and who seeks the certificate regarding the individual’s telephone number or to an inquiry from the person who is responding to the allegation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 33.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Automatic Purchase Renewals [17600. - 17606.]

17600.

It is the intent of the Legislature to end the practice of ongoing charging of consumer credit or debit cards or third party payment accounts without the consumers’ explicit consent for ongoing shipments of a product or ongoing deliveries of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (SB 340)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative December 1, 2010, pursuant to Section 17606.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.

(a) For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Automatic renewal” means a plan, arrangement, or provision of a contract that contains a free-to-pay conversion or in which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement is automatically renewed at the end of a definite term for a subsequent term.

(2) “Automatic renewal offer terms” and “continuous service offer terms” means the following clear and conspicuous disclosures:

(A) That the subscription or purchasing agreement will continue until the consumer cancels.

(B) The description of the
 cancellation policy that applies to the offer.

(C) The recurring charges that will be charged to the consumer’s credit or debit card or payment account with a third party as part of the automatic renewal plan or arrangement, and that the amount of the charge may change, if that is the case, and the amount to which the charge will change, if known.

(D) The length of the automatic renewal term or that the service is continuous, unless the length of the term is chosen by the consumer.

(E) The minimum purchase obligation, if any.

(3) “Clear and conspicuous” or “clearly and conspicuously” means in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the